District of Columbia statutes.
42-2432

Prohibited foreclosure transactions and practices.

(a)

It shall be unlawful, for compensation or gain or for potential or contingent compensation or gain, whether at the time of the transaction or in the future, to engage in, arrange, offer, promote, promise, solicit participation in, or carry out a foreclosure rescue transaction in the District or concerning residential property in the District. Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit foreclosure rescue transactions that are not carried out for compensation or gain or for potential or contingent compensation or gain, including transactions engaged in between or among family members or arranged by a bona fide nonprofit community organization or nonprofit housing organization.

(b)

It shall be unlawful to advertise, offer, or promote the availability of foreclosure rescue transactions or services related to foreclosure rescue transactions.

(c)

It shall be unlawful to advertise, offer, or promote foreclosure rescue services without disclosing, clearly and conspicuously, a precise description of the goods or services offered and how they will assist persons in avoiding or delaying foreclosure or curing or otherwise addressing a default or failure to timely pay a residential mortgage loan obligation.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prohibit the advertising of, offering of, promoting of, or engaging in foreclosure rescue transactions or foreclosure rescue services that are not carried out for compensation or gain or for potential or contingent compensation or gain, including transactions engaged in between or among family members or arranged by a bona fide nonprofit community organization or nonprofit housing organization.

Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-87, § 3, 54 DCR 11913